Utah statutes.
58-46a-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal of specialist license -- Limitation on renewal of intern license.

(1)  The division shall issue each license for a hearing instrument specialist in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule. The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  Each license as a hearing instrument intern shall be issued for a term of three years and may not be renewed.

(3)  At the time of renewal, the licensed hearing instrument specialist shall demonstrate satisfactory evidence of each of the following:

(a)  current certification by the National Board for Certification Hearing Instrument Sciences, or other acceptable certification approved by the division in collaboration with the board;

(b)  calibration of all appropriate technical instruments used in practice; and

(c)  completion of continuing professional education required in Section 58-46a-304.

(4)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with the provisions of Section 58-1-308, or unless surrendered in accordance with the provisions of Section 58-1-306.

